src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pl.aff
SFX f Y 48
SFX f   a         i         [^jk nrtw]a
SFX f   a         0         ja
SFX f   ka        ek        [^s]ka
SFX f   a         0         ska
SFX f    a        e          a
SFX f   na        en        na
SFX f   obra       br       obra
SFX f   a         0         ora
SFX f   a         0         [^ o]ta
SFX f   ota        t        ota
SFX f    ta        t         ta
SFX f   wa        ew        rwa
SFX f   a         0         twa
SFX f   e         y         [^cijl]e
SFX f   ce        ec        [^e]lce
SFX f   e         0         elce
SFX f   ce        iec       pce
SFX f   e         0         [aiy]ce
SFX f   ce        iec       wce
SFX f   e         i         [^bcnpz]ie
SFX f   e         0         [bcpz]ie
SFX f   e         0         nie
SFX f   nie                 anie
SFX f   e         i         [^aeioy]je
SFX f   je        i         [aeo]je
SFX f   e         0         [iy]je
SFX f   e         i         le
SFX f   i         0         gi
SFX f   ki        ek        [^  i o uy ]ki
SFX f    ki       ciek       ki
SFX f   i         0         [ iouy]ki
SFX f    ki       niek       ki
SFX f   y         0         [^bcd tw]y
SFX f   y         0         [^ ]by
SFX f    by        b         by
SFX f   cy        iec       cy
SFX f   y         0         [^o]dy
SFX f   y         0         [^w]ody
SFX f   ody        d        wody
SFX f   y         0         [auy] y
SFX f    y        e         [dr] y
SFX f   o y                do y
SFX f   y         0         so y
SFX f   y         0         [^o]ty
SFX f   y         0         [^b]oty
SFX f   oty        t        boty
SFX f   y         0         [^o]wy
SFX f   owy        w        owy
